Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-539
Waterworks; construction; cost; assessments.

The expense of erecting, locating, and constructing reservoirs and hydrants for the purpose of fire protection, and the expense of constructing and laying water mains, pipes or such parts thereof as may be just and lawful, may be assessed upon and collected from the property and real estate especially benefited thereby, if any, in such manner as may be provided for the making of special assessments for other public improvements in such cities and villages.

Laws 1881, c. 23, § 8, XV, p. 179;

Laws 1885, c. 20, § 1, XV, p. 170;

Laws 1887, c. 12, § 1, XV, p. 298;

Laws 1893, c. 8, § 1, p. 135;

Laws 1903, c. 21, § 1, p. 252;

Laws 1905, c. 30, § 1, p. 258;

Laws 1907, c. 17, § 1, p. 128;

R.S.1913, § 5119;

Laws 1917, c. 103, § 1, p. 273;

Laws 1919, c. 48, § 1, p. 139;

Laws 1919, c. 52, § 1, p. 153;

Laws 1919, c. 46, § 2, p. 133;

C.S.1922, § 4292;

Laws 1925, c. 41, § 1, p. 159;

C.S.1929, § 17-441;

Laws 1935, c. 34, § 1, p. 143;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 17-441;

R.S.1943, § 17-539.

Doubts as to meaning of statutory limitations as applied to special assessments to acquire water system should be determined in favor of taxpayer. Futscher v. City of Rulo, 107 Neb. 521, 186 N.W. 536 (1922).